North Dakota, session 69, HB1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-60 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Office of entrepreneurship - Duties - Report .
1. As used in this section:
a. "Business" means a corporation, partnership, company, cooperative, sole
proprietorship, or other legal entity organized or operating for pecuniary or
nonpecuniary gain.
b. "Entrepreneur" means an individual who initiates and assumes the financial risk
of a business.
c. "State agency" means an agency, board, commission, bureau, office,
department, institution, and any other state governmental entity. The term
excludes the legislative and judicial branches of state government.
2. There is created an office of entrepreneurship within the department of commerce.
Employees of the office of entrepreneurship report to the commissioner. The office of
entrepreneurship shall:
a. Work to strengthen policies and programs supporting the growth of
entrepreneurship in the state, including across demographic segments and
geographic areas.
Page No. 1 25.0450.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. Work with stakeholders and organizations supporting entrepreneurship to:
(1) Enhance the learning and skills of entrepreneurs;
(2) Provide technical support to entrepreneurs; and
(3) Expand access to resources for entrepreneurs.
c. Serve as a point of contact to assist businesses that have been in operation less
than five years, in their interactions with state agencies and, when appropriate,
refer the businesses to other state or local agencies that provide assistance to
businesses.
3. A state agency shall cooperate with and assist the office of entrepreneurship in the
performance of its duties and functions.
4. Before August of each year, the office of entrepreneurship shall provide a report to the
legislative management which includes:
a. A summary of work accomplished in support of growing entrepreneurship in the
state;
b. A summary of events held to drive collaboration with stakeholders and
organizations supporting entrepreneurship;
c. The number of participating businesses that have been in operation less than five
years;
d. Recommendations for improving entrepreneurship in the state, including
identifying regional challenges to entrepreneurship; and
e. Any additional information deemed necessary to provide an accurate depiction of
the condition of entrepreneurship in the state.
5. All financial records , or records containing financial information made or received in
accordance with this section are an exempt record under section 44 - 04 - 17.1 .
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE - OFFICE OF
ENTREPRENEURSHIP - FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POSITIONS. There is appropriated out of
any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$485,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of commerce for the
purpose of providing salaries and benefits for office of entrepreneurship staff, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The department of commerce is authorized
two full-time equivalent positions to administer the office of entrepreneurship.
Page No. 2 25.0450.03000